Arkansas, session 2025, HB1262.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - ARKANSAS BIOSCIENCES INSTITUTE. There is
hereby established for the Arkansas State University - Arkansas Biosciences
Institute for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of
regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item No. of Fiscal Year
No. Title Employees 2025-2026
ARKANSAS BIOSCIENCES INSTITUTE
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ADMINISTRATIVE POSITIONS
*HAR034*
01/27/2025 2:03:21 PM HAR034

HB1262
(1) Exec. Dir. of Biosciences Institute 1 $258,983
(2) Project/Program Administrator 8
Executive Project/Program Director $207,294
Exec. Project/Program Manager $181,097
Sr. Project/Program Director $167,382
Project/Program Director $135,750
Project/Program Manager $123,020
Executive Assistant $115,000
Project/Program Specialist $106,139
(3) Asst. Director, Biosciences Institute 1 $136,651
(4) Research Assistant 3 $88,060
(5) Skilled Trades Pool 1
Skilled Trades Foreman $74,157
Skilled Trades Supervisor $71,305
Skilled Tradesman $68,562
Skilled Trades Helper $52,101
Apprentice Tradesman $46,319
(6) Administrative Support Pool 1
Administrative Assistant $67,284
Administrative Analyst $67,284
Administrative Support Supervisor $62,208
Administrative Specialist III $59,815
Administration Support Specialist $59,815
Administrative Specialist II $53,175
Administrative Support Specialist $53,175
Administrative Specialist I $47,272
Extra Help Assistant $38,855
(7) Institutional Svcs. Assistant 3 $42,025
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(8) Research Associate 3 $147,091
(9) Research Graduate Assistant 15 $57,379
NINE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(10) Faculty 7
Research Professor $237,829
01/27/2025 2:03:21 PM HAR034

HB1262
Research Associate Professor $224,718
Research Assistant Professor $212,176
Research Instructor $145,990
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 43

SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS BIOSCIENCES INSTITUTE. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Arkansas State University, to be payable from the
Arkansas Biosciences Institute Program Account of the Tobacco Settlement
Program Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of the Arkansas
State University - Arkansas Biosciences Institute for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $2,149,024
(02) EXTRA HELP 15,914
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 551,206
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 2,527,694
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 400,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $5,643,838

SECTION 3. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. TRANSFER
RESTRICTIONS. The appropriations provided in this act shall not be
transferred under the provisions of Arkansas Code 19-4-522, but only as
provided by this act.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 4. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. TRANSFER
PROVISIONS. The state-supported institution of higher education in this act
01/27/2025 2:03:21 PM HAR034

HB1262
may transfer appropriations between the various line items within each
appropriation contained in this appropriation act. Such transfers shall be
made only after the approval of the Division of Higher Education and the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, and the approval of the Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee.
The General Assembly has determined that the institution in this act could
be operated more efficiently if some flexibility is given to that institution
and that flexibility is being accomplished by providing authority to transfer
between items of appropriation made by this act. Since the General Assembly
has granted the institution broad powers under the transfer of
appropriations, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General
Assembly maintain oversight of the utilization of the transfers by requiring
prior approval of the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee in the
utilization of the transfer authority. Therefore, the requirement of
approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a
severable part of this section. If the requirement of approval by the
Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a
court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is void.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 5. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. POSITIONS.
(a) Nothing in this act shall be construed as a commitment of the State of
Arkansas or any of its agencies or institutions to continue funding any
position paid from the proceeds of the Tobacco Settlement in the event that
Tobacco Settlement funds are not sufficient to finance the position.
(b) State funds will not be used to replace Tobacco Settlement funds when
such funds expire, unless appropriated by the General Assembly and authorized
by the Governor.
(c) A disclosure of the language contained in (a) and (b) of this Section
shall be made available to all new hire and current positions paid from the
proceeds of the Tobacco Settlement by the Tobacco Settlement Commission.
(d) Whenever applicable the information contained in (a) and (b) of this
Section shall be included in the employee handbook and/or Professional
Services Contract paid from the proceeds of the Tobacco Settlement.
01/27/2025 2:03:21 PM HAR034

HB1262
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 6. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds authorized by this act
shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency and funds made
available by law for the support of such appropriations; and the restrictions
of the State Purchasing Law, the General Accounting and Budgetary Procedures
Law, the Regular Salary Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors,
and other fiscal control laws of this State, where applicable, and
regulations promulgated by the Department of Finance and Administration, as
authorized by law, shall be strictly complied with in disbursement of said
funds.

SECTION 7. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General Assembly that any funds
disbursed under the authority of the appropriations contained in this act
shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for which this act was
adopted, as evidenced by Initiated Act 1 of 2000, the Agency Requests,
Executive Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the
budget manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration,
letters, or summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas
Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and
adoption.

SECTION 8. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
01/27/2025 2:03:21 PM HAR034

HB1262
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.


































01/27/2025 2:03:21 PM HAR034